District of Columbia statutes.
42-1001

“Power” defined.

A power is an authority to do some act in relation to lands or the creation of estates therein or of charges thereon which the owner granting or reserving such power might himself lawfully perform.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1037
1981 Ed., § 45-101.
1973 Ed., § 45-1001.
Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act: See § 19-1501 et seq.